Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 10 Labeling of Thread

6-10-1.
Labeling as to weight or length required.

It shall be unlawful to keep for the purpose of sale, offer or expose for sale, or sell any sewing, basting, mending, darning, crochet, tatting, handknitting, or embroidery thread, put up or packaged in advance of sale on spools, tubes, cones, bobbins, or in balls, skeins, or other similar forms referred to in this chapter as units, for either wholesale or retail sale, unless each of the units is definitely, plainly, and conspicuously marked to show the net weight in terms of avoirdupois pounds and ounces, or the length in yards of the thread, subject, however, to all of the following provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 141, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 167, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 197, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3009, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-10-1

.

6-10-2.
Length of small units to be shown — Bobbins — Packages for household use.

When the net weight of the thread in or on any unit is less than two (2) ounces avoirdupois, the unit shall be marked to show the length of the thread in yards as unwound from the unit. Ready-wound bobbins that are not sold separately shall not be required to be individually marked, but the package containing the bobbins shall be marked to show the number of bobbins contained in the package and the net weight or measure of the thread on each bobbin. Any retail unit of thread, sold only for household use, consisting of a package containing two (2) or more similar individual units, that are not sold separately, shall be marked to show the number of individual units in the package and the net weight or measure of the thread in each individual unit, but this provision shall not apply where the individual units are separately marked.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 387, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 3009, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-10-2

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 6.

6-10-3.
Identification of manufacturer or distributor.

The marking required by this chapter shall in all cases be in combination with the name and place of business of the manufacturer or distributor of the thread, or a trademark, symbol, brand, or other mark that positively identifies the manufacturer or distributor and which shall be filed with the state sealer of weights and measures in the state department of labor and training.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 387, § 3; P.L. 1952, ch. 3009, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-10-3

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 6.

6-10-4.
Determination of net content.

The net content of any unit of thread shall be determined by ascertaining the average net weight or yardage of not less than ten (10) units of thread of the same type and put-up, selected at random from the units kept for the purpose of sale, sold, exposed, or offered for sale. That average shall not be less by more than three percent (3%) than the weight or yardage marked on the units or the package containing the units.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 387, § 4; P.L. 1952, ch. 3009, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-10-4

.

6-10-5.
Enforcement of chapter.

The state sealer of weights and measures in the state department of labor and training shall enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter. All actions, suits, complaints, and prosecutions for the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter shall be brought by and in the name of the state sealer of weights and measures, or by and in the name of the state director of labor and training or his or her duly authorized representative.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 387, § 5; P.L. 1952, ch. 3009, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-10-5

.

6-10-6.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation who willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each separate offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 141, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 167, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 197, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 387, § 2; G.L., ch. 387, § 6; P.L. 1952, ch. 3009, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-10-6

; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 18; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 6.

6-10-7.
Wool products exempt.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to wool or to textile products made in whole or in part of wool.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 387, § 7; P.L. 1952, ch. 3009, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-10-7

.